nl: Volwassenen: Erotisch; Wapens en wapenaccessoires
sv: Avsett för vuxna: Erotik; Vapen och vapentillbehör
es: Productos para adultos: Sexo; Armas y accesorios para armas
pt-PT: Para adultos: Erótico; Armas e acessórios para armas
lt-LT: Prekės suaugusiesiems: Erotika; Ginklai ir ginklų priedai
tr: Yetişkinlere Yönelik Ürünler: Erotik; Silahlar ve Silah Aksesuarları
ja: 成人向け: アダルト; 武器&武器関連用品
hu: Érett: Erotikus; Fegyverek és fegyverkiegészítők
cs: Pro dospělé: Erotika; Zbraně a příslušenství ke zbraním
pt-BR: Adultos: Erótico; Armas e acessórios para armas
bg-BG: За възрастни: Еротика; Оръжия и аксесоари за оръжие
hr-HR: Za odrasle: Erotsko; Oružje i pribor za oružje
pl: Dojrzały: Artykuły erotyczne; Broń i akcesoria do broni
fr: Mature: Érotisme; Armes et accessoires d’armes
el: Είδη ενηλίκων: Ερωτικά είδη; Όπλα & αξεσουάρ Όπλων
it: Articoli per adulti: Erotismo; Armi e accessori per armi
th: สำหรับผู้ใหญ่: อิโรติก; อาวุธและอุปกรณ์เสริมอาวุธ
de: Reif: Erotik; Waffen und Waffenzubehör
zh-TW: 成人用品: 情趣用品; 武器配件
sl-SI: Odrasla vsebina: Erotika; Orožje in dodatki za orožje
sk-SK: Dospelý: Erotické; Zbrane a príslušenstvo k zbraniam
en: Mature: Erotic; Weapons & Weapon Accessories
da: Voksne: Erotik; Våben og våbentilbehør
nb: Voksen: Erotikk; Våpen og våpentilbehør
ru: Товары для взрослых: Эротика; Оружие и аксессуары для него
vi: Trưởng thành: Khiêu dâm; Vũ khí và Phụ kiện vũ khí
zh-CN: 成人: 情爱用品; 武器/武器配件
fi: Aikuiset: Erotiikka; Aseet ja asetarvikkeet
ko: 성인용 제품: 성인용품; 무기/무기 부대용품
ro-RO: Adulți: Erotic; Arme și accesorii pentru arme